Hawaii statutes.
§166-8 Preference right. Any person
who is otherwise qualified to take an agricultural park lot, who is a veteran
with an honorable discharge, or who qualifies as a displaced farmer, or who
operates a farm located in a zoning district where such use is a nonconforming
use, or who qualifies as a new farmer, shall be given preference in obtaining
an agricultural park lot. [L 1986, c 222, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 22, §4; am L
1990, c 52, §5]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next